Wisconsin, session 2025, SB488.
do enact as follows:SB488,11Section 1. 103.44 of the statutes is created to read:SB488,2,92103.44 Compensation and benefits in job postings; retention of 3records; penalties. (1) Listing requirement. In a job posting seeking 4applicants that is made by an employer or by a 3rd party on behalf of an employer, 5the employer or 3rd party shall include the salary range and any other benefits 6available for the position, such as health insurance and retirement benefits. In this 7subsection, “salary range” means the minimum and maximum salary or hourly pay 8for a specific job available with an employer based on the employer’s good faith 9estimate at the time the job is posted.SB488,2,1510(2) Record retention. An employer or a 3rd party on behalf of an employer 11shall retain records of listings for job vacancies and employment opportunities, 12including the information provided in sub. (1), for at least 2 years after the vacancy 13or employment opportunity is filled or no longer published, whichever is later, and 14shall allow an employee of the employer that posted the listing or an employee of the 15department to review the records.SB488,2,1716(3) Sanctions and penalties. (a) For a first violation of sub. (1) or (2), the 17department shall issue a written warning.SB488,2,1918(b) An employer with fewer than 50 employees shall forfeit $300 for a 2nd 19violation of sub. (1) or (2).SB488,3,21(c) An employer with fewer than 50 employees shall forfeit $600 for a 3rd or 2subsequent violation of sub. (1) or (2).SB488,3,43(d) An employer with 50 or more employees shall forfeit $1,000 for a 2nd 4violation of sub. (1) or (2).SB488,3,65(e) An employer with 50 or more employees shall forfeit $2,000 for a 3rd or 6subsequent violation of sub. (1) or (2).SB488,3,87(f) The penalties under pars. (b) to (e) apply to a 3rd party that is required to 8comply with subs. (1) and (2) in the same manner as they apply to an employer.SB488,3,109(g) Each failure to comply with a duty under sub. (1) or (2) is a separate 10violation.SB488,3,1111(4) Rules. The department may promulgate rules to implement this section.SB488,3,1212